Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.390

Finding—Unregistered contractors enforcement team.

(1) The legislature finds that it is contrary to public policy to allow unregistered contractors to continue doing business illegally.

(2) The department of labor and industries, the employment security department, and the department of revenue shall establish an unregistered contractors enforcement team. The team shall develop a written plan to coordinate the activities of the participating agencies to enforce the state's contractor registration laws and rules and other state laws and rules deemed appropriate by the team. In developing the plan, the team shall seek the input and advice of interested stakeholders who support the work of the team.

(3) The director or the director's designee shall call the initial meeting of the unregistered contractors enforcement team by September 1, 2001. The team shall complete the plan and forward it to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature and to the departments that contribute members to the team by December 1, 2001.

(4) The department of labor and industries, the employment security department, and the department of revenue shall accomplish the tasks listed in this section within existing resources, including but not limited to fees charged under RCW 18.27.075.

[ 2001 c 159 s 13.]